Hawaii statutes.
§329-56 Burden of proof; liabilities.
(a) It is not necessary for the State to negate any exemption or exception in
this chapter in any complaint, information, indictment or other pleading or in
any trial, hearing, or other proceeding under this chapter. The burden of
proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.

(b) In the absence of proof that a person is
the duly authorized holder of an appropriate registration or order form issued
under this chapter, the person is presumed not to be the holder of the
registration or form. The burden of proof is upon the person to rebut the
presumption.

(c) No liability is imposed by this chapter
upon any authorized state, county or municipal officer, engaged in the lawful
performance of the officer's duties. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next